Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3535
Special assessments; sinking fund; transfer of funds.

All special assessments provided by the Community Improvement District Act and all connection charges collected shall, when levied, constitute a sinking fund for the purpose of paying the cost of the improvements provided for in the Community Improvement District Act with allowable interest thereon and shall be solely and strictly applied to such purpose to the extent required. Any excess thereof may be by the board or the administrator, after fully discharging the purposes for which levied, transferred to such other fund or funds as the board of trustees or the administrator may deem advisable.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 35.
April 17, 2026